th: รูปแบบของสายเบรก: ห่วงแบบต่อเนื่อง (ไร้รอยต่อ); ตัดตามความยาว (ต้องมีการรัด); อื่นๆ
it: Forma della fascia del freno: Anello continuo (senza fine); Tagliato a misura (richiede fissaggio); Altro
hu: Fékszalag formája: Folytonos hurok (végtelenített); Vágott hossz (rögzítést igényel); Egyéb
hr-HR: Oblik kočione trake: Neprekinuta petlja (beskrajna); Odrezana duljina (zahtijeva pričvršćivanje); Ostalo
nl: Remband vorm: Continue lus (eindeloos); Afgesneden lengte (bevestiging vereist); Overig
ru: Форма тормозной ленты: Замкнутая петля (бесконечная); Отрезанная длина (требует крепления); Другое
pt-PT: Forma da cinta de travão: Laço contínuo (sem fim); Comprimento cortado (requer fixação); Outro
sl-SI: Oblika zavornega traku: Neprekinjena zanka (neskončna); Prirejena dolžina (potrebno pritrjevanje); Drugo
pl: Forma taśmy hamulcowej: Pętla ciągła (bezkońcowa); Cięta na wymiar (wymaga mocowania); Inne
sk-SK: Tvar brzdového pásu: Uzavretá slučka (nekonečná); Odrezaná dĺžka (vyžaduje upevnenie); Iný
tr: Fren bandı formu: Sürekli döngü (sonsuz); Kesik uzunluk (bağlama gerektirir); Diğer
zh-CN: 制动带形状: 闭环（无端）; 裁剪长度（需要固定）; 其他
ko: 브레이크 밴드 형태: 연속 루프(엔드리스); 컷 길이(고정 필요); 기타
el: Μορφή της ζώνης φρένων: Συνεχόμενη θηλιά (ατέρμονη); Κομμένο μήκος (απαιτείται στερέωση); Άλλο
nb: Bremsebåndform: Kontinuerlig sløyfe (endeløs); Tilpasset lengde (krever festing); Annet
ro-RO: Forma benzii de frână: Buclă continuă (fără capăt); Tăiat la lungime (necesită prindere); Altele
lt-LT: Stabdžių juostos forma: Uždaro kontūro (begalinė); Atpjautas ilgis (reikalingas tvirtinimas); Kitas
da: Form på bremsebånd: Kontinuerlig løkke (endeløs); Afskåret længde (kræver fastgørelse); Andet
vi: Hình dạng dây phanh: Vòng liên tục (vô tận); Chiều dài cắt sẵn (cần buộc chặt); Khác
pt-BR: Forma da banda de freio: Laço contínuo (sem fim); Cortada no tamanho (requer fixação); Outro
fi: Jarrunauhan muoto: Jatkuva silmukka (päättymätön); Leikattu pituus (vaatii kiinnityksen); Muu
de: Bremsbandform: Endlosschleife; Zugeschnitten (erfordert Befestigung); Sonstige
fr: Forme de la bande de frein: Boucle continue (sans fin); Longueur coupée (nécessite une fixation); Autre
es: Forma de la banda de freno: Bucle continuo (sin fin); Longitud de corte (requiere fijación); Otro
zh-TW: 制動器帶規格: 連續環狀 (無接縫); 裁剪長度 (需固定); 其他
cs: Tvar brzdového pásu: Souvislá smyčka (nekonečná); Řezaná délka (vyžaduje upevnění); Jiné
en: Brake band form: Continuous loop (endless); Cut length (requires fastening); Other
bg-BG: Форма на спирачната лента: Непрекъсната примка (безкрайна); Изрязана дължина (изисква закрепване); Други
ja: ブレーキバンド形状: 連続ループ (エンドレス); カット済み (固定が必要); その他
sv: Bromsbandets form: Kontinuerlig slinga (ändlös); Klippt längd (kräver infästning); Övrigt